Nebraska, session 109, LB1128.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1128 LB1128
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 53-123.17, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-123.17 (1)(a) (1) A local governing body may designate an
entertainment district in which a commons area may be used by retail,
craft brewery, and microdistillery licensees and holders of a
manufacturer's license which obtain an entertainment district license.
The local governing body may, at any time, revoke such designation if it
finds that the commons area threatens the health, safety, or welfare of
the public or has become a common nuisance.
(b) As part of such designation, a local governing body may
designate consumption-only areas of such district. A business within the
boundaries of such area may obtain a consumption-only class of
entertainment district license pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section.
(c) The local governing body shall file any such the designation or
the revocation of the designation with the commission.
(2) An entertainment district license allows the sale of alcoholic
liquor for consumption on the premises within the confines of a commons
area or within the premises of a consumption-only license holder as
provided in subsection (6) of this section. The consumption of alcoholic
liquor in the commons area or consumption-only area shall only occur
during the hours authorized for sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption
on the premises under section 53-179 and while food service is available
in the commons area or is available for sale by at least one holder of an
entertainment district license. Only the holder of an entertainment
district license or employees of such licensee may sell or dispense
alcoholic liquor in the commons area.
(3) An entertainment district licensee shall serve alcoholic liquor
to be consumed in the commons area or consumption-only area in containers
that prominently display the licensee's trade name or logo or some other
mark that is unique to the licensee under the licensee's retail license,
-2-

LB1128 LB1128
2026 2026
craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or manufacturer's
license. An entertainment district licensee may allow alcohol sold by
another entertainment district licensee to enter the licensed premises of
either licensee. No entertainment district licensee shall allow alcoholic
liquor to leave the commons area or the premises licensed under its
retail license, craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or
manufacturer's license.
(4) If the licensed premises of the holder of a license to sell
alcoholic liquor at retail issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124,
a craft brewery license, a microdistillery license, or a manufacturer's
license is adjacent to a commons area in an entertainment district
designated by a local governing body pursuant to this section, the holder
of the license may obtain an annual entertainment district license as
prescribed in this section. The entertainment district license shall be
issued for the same period and may be renewed in the same manner as the
retail license, craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or
manufacturer's license.
(5) In order to obtain an entertainment district license, a person
eligible under subsection (4) of this section shall:
(a) File an application with the commission upon such forms as the
commission prescribes; and
(b) Pay an additional license fee of three hundred dollars for the
privilege of serving alcohol in the entertainment district payable to the
clerk of the local governing body in the same manner as license fees
under subdivision (4) of section 53-134.
(6) A business that is located within the boundaries of an
entertainment district but that does not hold a retail, craft brewery,
microdistillery, or manufacturer's license under the Nebraska Liquor
Control Act may apply to the commission for a consumption-only class of
entertainment district license on forms prescribed by the commission.
Such application shall include a license fee of twenty-five dollars
-3-

LB1128 LB1128
2026 2026
payable to the commission. The commission shall grant such licenses so
long as the local governing body has (a) designated consumption-only
areas for such entertainment district and (b) approved the applicant's
consumption-only class of entertainment district license prior to
submission of the same to the commission. Such class of consumption-only
entertainment district license shall authorize the holder to allow
alcoholic beverages sold within the boundaries of an entertainment
district by other entertainment district licensees to be carried in and
out of such holder's business premises by patrons, so long as such
business (a) does not sell or serve such alcoholic liquor and (b)
otherwise complies with the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, especially those
provisions forbidding consumption of alcoholic liquor by minors.
(7) (6) When an application for an entertainment district license is
filed, the commission shall notify the clerk of the local governing body.
The commission shall include with such notice one copy of the application
by mail or electronic delivery. The local governing body and the
commission shall process the application in the same manner as provided
in section 53-132.
(8) (7) The local governing body may impose an occupation tax on the
business of an entertainment district licensee doing business within the
liquor license jurisdiction of the local governing body as provided in
subdivision (12)(b) (11)(b) of this section in accordance with section
53-132.
(9) (8) The local governing body with respect to entertainment
district licensees within its liquor license jurisdiction as provided in
subdivision (12)(b) (11)(b) of this section may cancel an entertainment
district license for cause for the remainder of the period for which such
entertainment district license is issued. Any person whose entertainment
district license is canceled may appeal to the commission in accordance
with section 53-134.
(10) (9) A local governing body may regulate by ordinance, not
-4-

LB1128 LB1128
2026 2026
inconsistent with the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, any area it designates
as an entertainment district.
(11) (10) Violation of any provision of this section or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section by an
entertainment district licensee may be cause to revoke, cancel, or
suspend the retail license issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124,
craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or manufacturer's license
held by such licensee.
(12) (11) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) Commons area means an area:
(A) Within an entertainment district designated by a local governing
body;
(B) Shared by authorized licensees with entertainment district
licenses, including consumption-only entertainment district licensees;
(C) Abutting the licensed premises of such licensees;
(D) With reasonable safety measures in place to protect pedestrians,
including signage, lighting, and reduced motor vehicle speeds when motor
vehicles will be in close proximity to pedestrians; and
(E) With a prohibition on the carrying of open alcoholic liquor
containers and the consumption of alcoholic liquor on any open street or
highway except when necessary to cross the same at a designated
crosswalk.
(ii) Commons area may include any area of a public or private right-
of-way if the area otherwise meets the requirements of this section; and
(b) Local governing body means the governing body of the city or
village in which the entertainment district licensee is located.
Sec. 2. Original section 53-123.17, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-5-